apertium-ga-gv.ga.dix
    <pardef n="comha/ill__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llfar</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llfaidh</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llfaimid</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llfaidh</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llfaidh</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llfaidh</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llfaidh</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llfaí</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llfainn</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llfaimis</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llfá</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llfadh</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llfadh</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llfaidís</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llaim</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llaimis</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llaigí</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lladh</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llaidís</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lladh</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llamar</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lladar</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lltaí</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llainn</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llaimis</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lltá</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lladh</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lladh</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llaidís</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lta</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lta</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lta</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lta</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lltar</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llaim</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llaimid</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llann</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llann</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llann</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llann</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lla</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llaimid</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lla</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lla</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lla</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lla</l>
          <r>ill<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mó/r__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="síl/eadh__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eadh</l>
          <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="mór"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ó</i><par n="mó/r__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fuirseadh"><par n="initial-f"/><i>uirs</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="leithdháileadh"><i>leithdháil</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sailleadh"><par n="initial-s"/><i>aill</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="scinneadh"><i>scinn</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="réamhchinneadh"><i>réamhchinn</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="borrchaoineadh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>orrchaoin</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cáineadh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>áin</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="scileadh"><i>scil</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="díscaoileadh"><par n="initial-d"/><i>íscaoil</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dea-mhúineadh"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ea-mhúin</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="caoineadh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>aoin</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sraoilleadh"><par n="initial-s"/><i>raoill</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="silleadh"><par n="initial-s"/><i>ill</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="longbhriseadh"><i>longbhris</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tuineadh"><par n="initial-t"/><i>uin</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="comhaill"><par n="initial-c"/><i>omha</i><par n="comha/ill__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cor"><par n="initial-c"/><i>o</i><par n="mó/r__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="crinneadh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>rinn</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="brachshileadh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rachshil</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="réamhbhlaiseadh"><i>réamhbhlais</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sroicheadh"><par n="initial-s"/><i>roich</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="scaoileadh"><i>scaoil</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dianscaoileadh"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ianscaoil</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tarscaoileadh"><par n="initial-t"/><i>arscaoil</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="athdháileadh"><par n="initial-a"/><i>thdháil</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="íolbhriseadh"><par n="initial-í"/><i>olbhris</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="géarcháineadh"><par n="initial-g"/><i>éarcháin</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fiar"><par n="initial-f"/><i>ia</i><par n="mó/r__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cailleadh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>aill</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="athscinneadh"><par n="initial-a"/><i>thscinn</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="timfhilleadh"><par n="initial-t"/><i>imfhill</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dímhúineadh"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ímhúin</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="saighdeadh"><par n="initial-s"/><i>aighd</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="coilleadh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>oill</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fuarchaoineadh"><par n="initial-f"/><i>uarchaoin</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="blaiseadh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>lais</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ginmhilleadh"><par n="initial-g"/><i>inmhill</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="goilleadh"><par n="initial-g"/><i>oill</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="milleadh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ill</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="léirscaoileadh"><i>léirscaoil</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="briseadh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ris</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="craobhscaoileadh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>raobhscaoil</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="forghéilleadh"><par n="initial-f"/><i>orghéill</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cliseadh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>lis</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="scairdeadh"><i>scaird</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="droch-chor"><par n="initial-d"/><i>roch-cho</i><par n="mó/r__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aisfhilleadh"><par n="initial-a"/><i>isfhill</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mímhúineadh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ímhúin</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="urchoilleadh"><par n="initial-u"/><i>rchoill</i><par n="síl/eadh__n_m"/></e>
